North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 2. Commissioning.

§ 10B-5.
Qualifications.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Secretary shall commission as a notary any qualified person who submits an application in accordance with this Chapter.

A person qualified for a notarial commission shall meet all of the following requirements:

Be at least 18 years of age or legally emancipated as defined in Article 35 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

Reside or have a regular place of work or business in this State.

Reside legally in the United States.

Speak, read, and write the English language.

Possess a high school diploma or equivalent.

Pass the course of instruction described in this Article, unless the person is a licensed member of the North Carolina State Bar.

Purchase and keep as a reference the most recent manual approved by the Secretary that describes the duties and authority of notaries public.

Submit an application containing no significant misstatement or omission of fact. The application form shall be provided by the Secretary and be available at the register of deeds office in each county. Every application shall include the signature of the applicant written with pen and ink, and the signature shall be acknowledged by the applicant before a person authorized to administer oaths.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The notary shall be commissioned in his or her county of residence, unless the notary is not a North Carolina resident, in which case he or she shall be commissioned in the county of his or her employment or business.

The Secretary may deny an application for commission or recommission if any of the following apply to an applicant:

Submission of an incomplete application or an application containing material misstatement or omission of fact.

The applicant’s conviction or plea of admission or nolo contendere to a felony or any crime involving dishonesty or moral turpitude. In no case may a commission be issued to an applicant within 10 years after release from prison, probation, or parole, whichever is later.

A finding or admission of liability against the applicant in a civil lawsuit based on the applicant’s deceit.

The revocation, suspension, restriction, or denial of a notarial commission or professional license by this or any other state or nation. In no case may a commission be issued to an applicant within five years after the completion of all conditions of any disciplinary order.

A finding that the applicant has engaged in official misconduct, whether or not disciplinary action resulted.

An applicant knowingly using false or misleading advertising in which the applicant as a notary represents that the applicant has powers, duties, rights, or privileges that the applicant does not possess by law.

A finding by a state bar or court that the applicant has engaged in the unauthorized practice of law.

History.

Code, ss. 3304, 3305; Rev., ss. 2347, 2348; C.S., s. 3172; 1927, c. 117; 1959, c. 1161, s. 2; 1969, c. 563, s. 1; c. 912, s. 1; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1983, c. 427, ss. 1, 2; c. 713, s. 22; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226, s. 1; 1998-228, s. 3; 1999-337, s.3(a); 2001-450, s. 1; 2002-126, s. 29A.21; 2005-75, s. 1; 2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 2; 2009-227, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to validation of defective acknowledgments before notaries public in certain conveyances, see

G.S. 47-52

, 47-53, 47-102.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-59, s. 2, effective October 1, 2006, and except as otherwise set forth in this act, applicable to notarial acts performed on or after that date, rewrote subdivision (b)(9).

Session Laws 2009-227, s. 1, effective June 30, 2009, substituted “5,250” for “15,000” in the second sentence of subdivision (b)(9).

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1, effective July 1, 2013, deleted subdivision (b)(9), which read: “Obtain the recommendation of one publicly elected official in North Carolina and submit the recommendation with the application. The requirement of this subdivision shall not apply to any applicant who seeks to receive the oath of office from the register of deeds of a county where more than 5,250 active notaries public are on record on January 1 of the year when the application is filed.”

§ 10B-6.
Application for commission.

Every application for a notary commission shall be made on paper with original signatures, or in another form determined by the Secretary, and shall include all of the following:

A statement of the applicant’s personal qualifications as required by this Chapter.

A certificate or signed statement by the instructor evidencing successful completion of the course of instruction as required by this Chapter.

A notarized declaration of the applicant, as required by this Chapter.

Any other information that the Secretary deems appropriate.

The application fee required by this Chapter.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-7.
Statement of personal qualification.

The application for a notary commission shall include at least all of the following:

The applicant’s full legal name and the name to be used for commissioning, excluding nicknames.

The applicant’s date of birth.

The mailing address for the applicant’s residence, the street address for the applicant’s residence, and the telephone number for the applicant’s residence.

The applicant’s county of residence.

The name of the applicant’s employer, the street and mailing address for the applicant’s employer, and telephone number for the applicant’s employer.

The applicant’s last four digits of the applicant’s social security number.

The applicant’s personal and business e-mail addresses.

A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or proof of the applicant’s legal residency in this country.

A declaration that the applicant can speak, read, and writes in the English language.

A complete listing of any issuances, denials, revocations, suspensions, restrictions, and resignations of a notarial commission, professional license, or public office involving the applicant in this or any other state or nation.

A complete listing of any criminal convictions of the applicant, including any pleas of admission or nolo contendere, in this or any other state or nation.

A complete listing of any civil findings or admissions of fault or liability regarding the applicant’s activities as a notary, in this or any other state or nation.

The information provided in an application that relates to subdivisions (2), (3), (6), and (7) of subsection (a) of this section shall be considered confidential information and shall not be subject to disclosure under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 3.

§ 10B-8.
Course of study and examination.

Every applicant for an initial notary commission shall, within the three months preceding application, take a course of classroom instruction of not less than six hours approved by the Secretary and take a written examination approved by the Secretary. An applicant must answer at least eighty percent (80%) of the questions correctly in order to pass the exam. This subsection shall not apply to a licensed member of the North Carolina State Bar.

Every applicant for recommissioning shall pass a written examination approved by and administered by or under the direction of the Secretary, unless the person is a licensed member of the North Carolina State Bar.

The content of the course of instruction and the written examinations shall be notarial laws, procedures, and ethics.

The Secretary may charge such fees as are reasonably necessary to pay the cost associated with developing and administering examinations permitted by this Chapter and for conducting the training of notaries and notary instructors.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-9.
Length of term and jurisdiction.

A person commissioned under this Chapter may perform notarial acts in any part of this State for a term of five years, unless the commission is earlier revoked or resigned. No commissions shall be effective prior to the administration of the oath of office. Any notarial acts performed before the administration of the oath of office, either the original commissioning or recommissioning, are invalid.

History.

1891, c. 248; Rev., s. 2351; c.s., s. 3176; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-10.
Commission; oath of office; emergency extension.

If the Secretary grants a commission to an applicant, the Secretary shall notify the appointee and shall instruct the appointee regarding the proper procedure for taking the oath at the register of deeds office in the county of the appointee’s commissioning.

Except as provided in subsection (b1) of this section, the appointee shall appear before the register of deeds no later than 45 days after commissioning and shall be duly qualified by taking the general oath of office prescribed in

G.S. 11-11

and the oath prescribed for officers in

G.S. 11-7

.

(b1)

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, if the Secretary grants a commission after March 9, 2020, and before March 1, 2021, the appointee shall have 90 days to appear before the register of deeds to take the general oath of office. A register of deeds may administer the required oath to such appointee using video conference technology provided the appointee is personally known to the register of deeds or the appointee provides satisfactory evidence of the appointee’s identity to the register of deeds. As used in this subsection, video conference technology and satisfactory evidence are as defined in

G.S. 10B-25

.

After the appointee qualifies by taking the oath of office required under subsection (b) of this section, the register of deeds shall place the notary record in a book designated for that purpose, or the notary record may be recorded in the Consolidated Document Book and indexed in the Consolidated Real Property Index under the notary’s name in the grantor index. The notary record may be kept in electronic format so long as the signature of the notary public may be viewed and printed. The notary record shall contain the name and the signature of the notary as commissioned, the effective date and expiration date of the commission, the date the oath was administered, and the date of any restriction, suspension, revocation, or resignation. The record shall constitute the official record of the qualification of notaries public.

The register of deeds shall deliver the commission to the notary following completion of the requirements of this section and shall notify the Secretary of the delivery.

If the appointee does not appear before the register of deeds within the time prescribed in this section, the register of deeds must return the commission to the Secretary, and the appointee must reapply for commissioning. If the appointee reapplies within one year of the granting of the commission, the Secretary may waive the educational requirements of this Chapter.

History.

Code, ss. 3304, 3305; Rev., ss. 2347, 2348; C.S., s. 3173; 1969, c. 912, s. 2; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 4; 2020-3, s. 4.1(b); 2020-74, s. 27(a); 2020-80, s. 2.9(a).

§ 10B-11.
Recommissioning.

A commissioned notary may apply for recommissioning no earlier than 10 weeks prior to the expiration date of the notary’s commission.

A notary whose commission has not expired must comply with the following requirements to be recommissioned:

Submit a new application meeting the requirements of

G.S. 10B-6

, except for

G.S. 10B-6

(2).

Meet all the requirements of

G.S. 10B-5(b)

, except for

G.S. 10B-5(b)

(5), (6), and (9).

Achieve a passing score on the written examination required under G.S. 10B-8(b). This requirement does not apply if the notary is a licensed member of the North Carolina State Bar, or if the notary has been continuously commissioned in North Carolina since July 10, 1991, and has never been disciplined by the Secretary.

An individual may apply for recommissioning within one year after the expiration of the individual’s commission. The individual must comply with the requirement of subsection (b) of this section. The individual must also fulfill the educational requirement under G.S. 10B-8(a), unless the Secretary waives that requirement.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226, s. 2; 2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 5.

§ 10B-12.
Notarized declaration.

The application for a notary public commission shall contain the following declaration to be executed by each applicant under oath:

Declaration of Applicant I, (name of applicant), solemnly swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that the information in this application is true, complete, and correct; that I understand the official duties and responsibilities of a notary public in this State, as described in the statutes; and that I will perform to the best of my ability all notarial acts in accordance with the law. (signature of applicant)

Click to view

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-13.
Application fee.

Every applicant for a notary commission shall pay to the Secretary a nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-14.
Instructor’s certification.

The course of study required by

G.S. 10B-5(b)

shall be taught by an instructor certified under rules adopted by the Secretary. An instructor must meet the following requirements to be certified to teach a course of study for notaries public:

Complete and pass an instructor certification course of not less than six hours taught by the Director or other person approved by the Secretary.

Have at least one year of active experience as a notary public.

Maintain a current commission as a notary public.

Possess the current notary public guidebook.

Pay a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Certification to teach a course of study for notaries shall be effective for two years. A certification may be renewed by passing a recertification course taught by the Director or other person approved by the Secretary and by paying a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The following individuals may be certified to teach a course of study for notaries public without paying the fee required by this section, and they may renew their certification without paying the renewal fee, so long as they remain actively employed in the capacities named:

Registers of deeds.

Clerks of court.

The Director and other duly authorized employees of the Secretary.

Former registers of deeds and clerks of court who have been certified as notary public instructors must apply for commissioning as a notary public but are exempt from the education requirements of

G.S. 10B-8

after successful completion of an examination administered by the Secretary.

Assistant and deputy registers of deeds and assistant and deputy clerks of court must have a regular notary commission prior to receiving a certification or recertification as a notary public instructor.

The Secretary may suspend or revoke the certification of a notary instructor for violating the provisions of this Chapter or any of the administrative rules implementing it.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1998-212, s. 29A.9(a); 1998-228, s. 4; 1999-337, s. 3(b); 2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-15 through 10B-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.